North Carolina, session 2025, SB563.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The Michael Jordans of Tomorrow Act."

PART II. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
SECTION 2. The General Assembly finds all of the following with respect to Name,
Image, and Likeness (NIL) compensation in North Carolina:
(1) The evolving landscape of NIL compensation has created a competitive
imbalance among states.
(2) North Carolina must modernize its NIL policies to remain competitive in
recruiting and retaining student-athletes.
(3) The lack of institutional involvement and State-level incentives places North
Carolina schools at a disadvantage as compared to other states with proactive
NIL policies.
(4) It is in the State's interest to provide clear laws and incentives to support
student-athletes while ensuring fair competition and compliance with the rules
of the National Collegiate Athletic Association.

PART III. HIGHER EDUCATION NAME, IMAGE, AND LIKENESS AGREEMENTS
SECTION 3. Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by adding the
following new Article to read:
"Article 39.
"Student-Athletes.
"§ 116-410. Definitions.
For purposes of this Part, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Constituent institution. – A constituent institution of The University of North
Carolina.
(2) NIL. – The use of a student's name, image, or likeness for commercial
purposes and in exchange for compensation to the student. Compensation may
include cash, in-kind gifts, or other tangible benefits to the student.
*S563-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) NIL Clearinghouse. – As established in G.S. 143B-437.022.
(4) NIL collective. – An entity affiliated with a constituent institution with the
purpose of supporting interscholastic athletics at that institution.
(5) Student-athlete. – A student enrolled in a constituent institution and
participating in interscholastic athletics at that institution.
"§ 116-411. Name, Image, and Likeness agreements.
(a) A constituent institution may assist a student-athlete in securing one or more NIL
agreements. Assistance permitted under this subsection may include any of the following
activities:
(1) Facilitating introductions between student-athletes and potential sponsors.
(2) Providing NIL education and contract review assistance.
(3) Partnering with businesses and collectives to promote NIL deals.
(b) A constituent institution shall not directly compensate any student-athlete for athletic
performance or participation.
(c) A constituent institution may collaborate with the NIL Clearinghouse to provide
support to students when entering NIL agreements.
"§ 116-412. Student-athlete compensation.
(a) A constituent institution may directly compensate a student-athlete for participating
in interscholastic athletics at that institution in addition to any other benefits provided to
student-athletes.
(b) A constituent institution may allocate up to twenty million five hundred thousand
dollars ($20,500,000) per year from interscholastic athletics revenues for direct compensation to
student-athletes. For purposes of this subsection, the term "interscholastic athletics revenues"
includes all of the following:
(1) Revenues received by athletic departments, including revenues from ticket
sales, television contracts, and merchandise.
(2) Contributions from private donors.
(3) Donations from an NIL collective.
(c) A constituent institution that provides students with direct compensation in
accordance with this section shall report all of the following information no later than October
15 of each year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Department of
Commerce:
(1) Total amounts provided to each student-athlete.
(2) Total amounts provided for student-athlete compensation for each
interscholastic athletic team.
(d) A constituent institution shall collaborate with the Department of Commerce to ensure
direct compensation of student-athletes provided in accordance with this section complies with
federal and State law and any other applicable rule or policy."

PART IV. NAME, IMAGE, AND LIKENESS TAX CREDITS
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 105-153.5(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Other Deductions. – In calculating North Carolina taxable income, a taxpayer may
deduct from the taxpayer's adjusted gross income any of the following items that are included in
the taxpayer's adjusted gross income:
…
(17) The amount received by the taxpayer as NIL compensation in accordance with
Article 29E of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes during the taxable year.
…."
SECTION 4.(b) Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-153.12. Name, image, likeness tax credit.
Page 2 Senate Bill 563-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Definitions. – The definitions in Article 29E of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
and the following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Eligible business. – A business that has entered into an NIL agreement with a
student-athlete.
(2) Name, Image, Likeness (NIL). – As defined in G.S. 115C-407.50.
(3) NIL agreement. – An agreement between an eligible business and
student-athlete to use the student's name, image, or likeness in accordance
with Article 29E of this Chapter.
(4) Pass-through entity. – A partnership, an S-corporation, or a limited liability
company subject to income tax under Part 1A or Part 2 of Article 4 of this
Chapter.
(5) Student-athlete. – A student enrolled in a constituent institution of The
University of North Carolina or an independent college or university located
in the State and participating in interscholastic athletics at that institution.
(b) Credit. – A taxpayer who is an eligible business is allowed a nonrefundable credit
against the tax imposed by Part 1, Part 1A, or Part 2 of Article 4 of this Chapter, as appropriate,
equal to fifty percent (50%) of the compensation paid by the eligible business to one or more
student-athletes during the taxable year pursuant to an NIL agreement.
(c) Allocation. – This subsection applies to eligible businesses that are pass-through
entities. Each individual who is a shareholder, partner, or member of an eligible business that is
a pass-through entity must be allocated the credit allowed the entity in an amount determined in
the same manner as the proportionate shares of income or loss of such entity would be
determined. The entity must make an irrevocable election with the Department of Revenue as to
the manner in which the credit is allocated. If an individual's share of the pass-through entity's
credit is limited due to the maximum allowable credit under this section for a taxable year, the
entity and its owners may not reallocate the unused credit among the other owners.
(d) Limitation. – The credit allowed under this section per eligible business shall not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per taxable year."
SECTION 4.(c) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

PART V. STATE-SUPPORTED NIL COLLECTIVE PROGRAM
SECTION 5. Article 39 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section
3 of this act, is amended by adding the following new section to read:
"§ 116-413. Name, Image, and Likeness collective entities.
(a) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall establish the North
Carolina NIL Advancement Fund (Fund) to provide matching funds with NIL collectives to
support NIL agreements.
(b) Constituent institutions may collaborate with NIL collectives to ensure compliance
with State and federal law and to provide financial oversight for NIL agreements.
(c) When providing matching funds from the Fund in accordance with this section, a
constituent institution shall prioritize support for all the following:
(1) Student-athletes who qualify for in-State tuition under the criteria set forth in
G.S. 116-143.1 and in accordance with the coordinated and centralized
residency determination process administered by the State Education
Assistance Authority.
(2) Student-athletes who have officially committed to that constituent institution.
(3) NIL agreements involving local businesses and tourism boards."

PART VI. HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS MAY ENTER NIL AGREEMENTS
SECTION 6.(a) G.S. 115C-407.50 reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 563-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 115C-407.50. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(4) Name, Image, and Likeness (NIL). – The use of a student's name, image, or
likeness for commercial purposes and in exchange for compensation to the
student. Compensation may include cash, in-kind gifts, or other tangible
benefits to the student.
(5) NIL Clearinghouse. – As established in G.S. 143B-437.022.
…."
SECTION 6.(b) G.S. 115C-407.55(1)h. reads as rewritten:
"h. Student amateur status requirements, including requirements and rules
related to use of a student's name, image, and likeness.likeness in
accordance with G.S. 115C-407.56."
SECTION 6.(c) Article 29E of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new subsection to read:
"§ 115C-407.56. Student-athlete use of name, image, and likeness.
(a) A student participating in interscholastic athletics may enter an agreement to use the
student's name, image, or likeness subject to the following restrictions:
(1) The agreement shall not condition the receipt, type, or extent of any
compensation to the student on the extent or quality of the student's athletic
performance.
(2) The agreement shall not condition the receipt, type, or extent of any
compensation to the student based on the student's current or future enrollment
at a specific institution.
(3) If a student is under 18 years of age, the student's parent or legal guardian shall
be a party to the agreement.
(4) A student shall be provided financial literacy resources prior to signing an
agreement, which may be provided by the school the student attends or the
NIL Clearinghouse.
(5) The agreement shall otherwise comply with State and federal law.
(6) Within 30 days of signing an agreement or an amendment to an agreement, a
copy of the agreement or updated agreement shall be provided to the NIL
Clearinghouse.
(b) If a high school student signs a contract or other binding document committing to
attend an accredited North Carolina college or university, then that student becomes eligible for
the following:
(1) State-endorsed NIL grants and sponsorships.
(2) Priority consideration for partnerships facilitated through the NIL
Clearinghouse.
SECTION 6.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 school year.

PART VII. NORTH CAROLINA NIL CLEARINGHOUSE
SECTION 7.(a) Part 2 of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-437.022. North Carolina NIL Clearinghouse.
(a) Definitions. – The definitions in Article 29E of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
and the following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Department. – The Department of Commerce.
(2) In-State college. – A constituent institution of The University of North
Carolina or an independent college or university located in the State.
Page 4 Senate Bill 563-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Name, Image, Likeness (NIL). – As defined in G.S. 115C-407.50.
(4) NIL agreement. – An agreement in which a student-athlete agrees to allow the
use of the student's name, image, or likeness in exchange for compensation in
accordance with Article 29E of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.
(5) Program. – The North Carolina NIL Clearinghouse Program created by this
section.
(6) Student-athlete. – A student participating in interscholastic athletics in this
State.
(b) Creation; Administration. – The North Carolina NIL Clearinghouse is established and
shall be administered by the Department of Commerce in accordance with this section.
(c) Purpose. – The purpose of the Program is to do the following:
(1) Educate student-athletes and their families about NIL agreements.
(2) Assist student-athletes in reviewing NIL agreements and navigating the NIL
process.
(3) Facilitate State-endorsed NIL partnerships by prioritizing student-athletes
attending in-State colleges.
(4) Provide grants to student-athletes who commit to in-State colleges.
(d) Agreement Review. – The Department shall review all NIL agreements paying more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000) of compensation to student-athletes to ensure that the
agreement (i) affords the student-athlete fair market value compensation, (ii) complies with the
requirements governing NIL agreements set forth in Article 29E of Chapter 115C of the General
Statutes, and (iii) provides any other relevant protections the Department deems necessary to
promote the well-being of the student-athlete.
(e) Grant Disbursement. – The Department may offer grants to student-athletes in
accordance with this subsection. Grant amounts to student-athletes shall not exceed the lesser of
(i) the amount received by the student-athlete as compensation under an NIL agreement or (ii)
five thousand dollars ($5,000). A student-athlete must apply to the Department for a grant during
the time frame and on a form prescribed by the Department. Grants shall be awarded on a first
come, first served basis. The total of all grants awarded under this subsection may not exceed the
total amount of funds appropriated to the Program.
(f) Compliance Board. – The Department shall hire or contract for, as necessary, any
relevant legal, financial, athletic, or other staff necessary to accomplish the purposes set forth in
this section.
(g) Administration. – The Department may use up to five percent (5%) of the funds
appropriated to the Program for administrative expenses.
(h) Rulemaking Authority. – The Department shall adopt rules to implement this
section."
SECTION 7.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year to be used by the Department for purposes consistent with Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 7.(c) Subsection (a) of this section is effective when it becomes law and
applies to NIL agreements entered into on or after that date. Subsection (b) of this section
becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART VIII. JOINT LEGISLATIVE STUDY COMMITTEE ON NIL REVENUE
SHARING
SECTION 8.(a) There is established the Joint Legislative Study Committee on
Name, Image, and Likeness Revenue Sharing (Committee). The Committee shall consist of three
members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and three members
of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The
President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each
Senate Bill 563-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
appoint a cochair of the Committee from among its membership. The Committee and the terms
of the members shall expire when the Committee submits a final report to the General Assembly.
Members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing officer.
SECTION 8.(b) The Committee shall study and make recommendations on the
following:
(1) The feasibility of entering into Name, Image, and Likeness (NIL) revenue
sharing agreements with student-athletes at constituent institutions of The
University of North Carolina.
(2) Models for NIL revenue sharing agreements from other states.
(3) Minimum criteria for NIL revenue sharing agreements.
(4) Any other issue the Committee considers relevant to the study.
SECTION 8.(c) The Committee shall meet upon the call of its cochairs. A quorum
of the Committee is a majority of its members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote
at a meeting at which a quorum is present. The Committee, while in the discharge of its official
duties, may exercise all powers provided for under G.S. 120-19 and Article 5A of Chapter 120
of the General Statutes. The Committee may contract for professional, clerical, or consultant
services, as provided by G.S. 120-32.02. Members of the Committee shall receive per diem,
subsistence, and travel allowance as provided in G.S. 120-3.1. The expenses of the Committee
shall be considered expenses incurred for the joint operation of the General Assembly.
SECTION 8.(d) The Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional and
clerical staff to assist the Committee in its work. The Director of Legislative Assistants of the
House of Representatives and the Director of Legislative Assistants of the Senate shall assign
clerical support staff to the Committee.
SECTION 8.(e) The Committee shall submit a final report on the results of its study,
including any proposed legislation, to the members of the Senate and the House of
Representatives on or before March 31, 2026, by filing a copy of the report with the Office of
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Office of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, and the Legislative
Library. The Committee shall terminate on March 31, 2026, or upon the filing of its final report,
whichever occurs first.

PART IX. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 6 Senate Bill 563-First Edition